District of Columbia statutes.
24-301

Repealed

Probation system; probation officers; appointment.

Repealed.

Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2425, Pub. L. 105-274, § 6(c)(2)(A)
1981 Ed., § 24-101.
Pub. L. 105-274, § 10, Oct. 21, 1998, 112 Stat. 2429, provided:
“Effective Date. Except as otherwise specifically provided, this Act and the amendments made by this Act shall take effect as if included in the enactment of title XI of the Balanced Budget Act of 1997.”